Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Workforce Protection Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201.1 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 16381 Page 1

A. As used in this act, "status verification system" or "e-
verification" means an electronic system operated by the federal
government, through which an authorized official of an agency of the
State of Oklahoma or of a political subdivision therein may make an
inquiry, by exercise of authority delegated pursuant to 8 U.S.C.,
Section 1373, to verify or ascertain the citizenship or immigration
status of any individual within the jurisdiction of the agency for
any purpose authorized by subsection B of this section. The status
verification system shall be deemed to include:
1. The E-Verify program of the Illegal Immigration Reform and
Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, P.L. 104-208, Division C,
Section 403(a), 8 U.S.C., Section 1324a, and operated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security, known as the E-Verify
program;
2. Any equivalent federal program designated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security or any other federal agency
authorized to verify the work eligibility status of newly hired
employees, pursuant to the Immigration Reform and Control Act of
1986, P.L. 99-603; or
3. Any other independent, third-party system with an equal or
higher degree of reliability as the programs, systems, or processes
described in this subsection.


Req. No. 16381 Page 2

B. Every employer registered to do business in the State of
Oklahoma shall utilize a status verification system for new hires,
including full-time, part-time, and seasonal new hires.
C. This section does not apply to the following:
1. Independent contractors;
2. Returning seasonal employees if rehired within twelve (12)
months if the employee was already authorized under the status
verification system. This provision is void if the employer falsely
classifies an employee as a seasonal employee for purposes of this
section or fails to complete the original certification; and
3. Individuals not classified as employees.
D. Agricultural employers may designate qualified third
parties, including cooperatives, farm bureaus, payroll service
providers, or licensed employer agents to submit status verification
system checks on their behalf.
E. An employer that utilizes the E-Verify program, or utilizes
a qualified third party as described in subsection D of this
section, operated by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, or any successor program formally designated by the
federal government for employment eligibility verification under the
Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986, shall be presumed to be
in compliance with the requirements of this section, absent evidence
of intentional or knowing violation. Use of any alternative status
verification system, or a qualified third party as described in
Req. No. 16381 Page 3

subs ection D of this section, shall not diminish an employer's
obligations under federal law nor negate the procedural protections
afforded under federal employment eligibility verification
requirements.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201.2 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Commissioner and Department of Labor shall
create a centralized online portal maintaining all forms,
instructions, multilingual guidance, and training modules relevant
to status verification systems and requirements. Employers with
fifty or more employees shall begin using a status verification
system within ninety (90) days, and all other employers shall begin
using a status verification system within one hundred eighty (180)
days after the Department finalizes and provides access to the
online portal. All new businesses organized in this state after the
effective date of this act shall utilize a status verification
system at the time of organization.
B. The Commissioner and Department of Labor shall work with the
Office of the Attorney General to create and publish an annual
statewide report identifying compliance rates, enforcement actions,
high-risk industries, and recommended amendments.
C. Any report published pursuant to this section shall present
data in aggregate form and shall not disclose the identity of any
Req. No. 16381 Page 4

spec ific employer unless an enforcement action has become final at
the Department level.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201.3 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of the Attorney General shall oversee the
enforcement of the provisions of the Oklahoma Workforce Protection
Act.
B. A fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor
more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each offense shall be
incurred for any employer who knowingly violates the requirements of
the Oklahoma Workforce Protection Act. Clerical errors, isolated
data entry mistakes, and system-caused inconsistency shall not be
considered violations.
1. An employer with fifty or more employees shall begin
incurring fines under this subsection beginning after the ninety-day
grace period described in subsection A of Section 3 of this act to
implement a status verification system. If the employer implements
a status verification system within ninety (90) days after the first
ninety (90) days expires, then fines shall be waived.
2. An employer with fewer than fifty employees shall begin
incurring fines under this subsection beginning after the one-
hundred-eighty-day grace period described in subsection A of Section
3 of this act to implement a status verification system. If the
Req. No. 16381 Page 5

empl oyer implements a status verification system within one hundred
eighty (180) days after the first one hundred eighty (180) days
expires, then fines shall be waived.
C. An employer who repeatedly violates Section 2 of this act
shall receive the following fines on the following occurrences:
1. A fine of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for every month
an employer continues employing an individual after receiving
nonconfirmation through a status verification system, provided the
employer complies with all federal notice and procedural
requirements; and
2. A fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for
every repeat offense of subsection A of this section.
D. An employer shall not be considered in violation of the
Oklahoma Workforce Protection Act for continuing to employ an
individual during the period in which the individual is lawfully
contesting or resolving a tentative nonconfirmation through a status
verification system, provided the employer complies with all federal
notice and procedural requirements. Enforcement actions and
penalties under this section shall apply only after a final
nonconfirmation has been issued and all applicable appeal or
correction procedures have been exhausted.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201.4 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 16381 Page 6

A. If the data points being verified within a status
verification system extend beyond their scope on the effective date
of this act or the purpose of the system extends beyond the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement and workforce
authorization, then the following shall occur:
1. The Office of the Attorney General shall suspend enforcement
for no less than six (6) months and up to twelve (12) months from
the date the status verification system is updated to reevaluate the
impact;
2. The Office of the Attorney General shall inform all members
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, Oklahoma State Senate, and
the Office of the Governor that the program is suspended; and
3. The Legislature shall consider and pass statutory amendments
required to update the scope of requirements before sine die
adjournment of the first regular session occurring after the
triggering event described in this section.
B. The Oklahoma Workforce Protection Act shall cease to have
the force and effect of law if the Legislature does not take action
pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section.
C. If the E-Verify, or federal equivalent program as allowed in
this act, is inaccessible due to a system failure or federal
government shutdown, this act will cease to be enforced during such
time period and employers will not be restricted in hiring new
employees. Once the system is available again, all new employees
Req. No. 16381 Page 7

hire d during this time period shall be processed as required by this
act and the enforcement of this act shall resume.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16381 TKR 02/16/26



















Req. No. 16381 Page 8